Utah statutes.
31A-2-210.   Participation in organizations.

The commissioner and the Insurance Department shall maintain close relations with the commissioners of other states and shall participate in the activities and affairs of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and other organizations to the extent, in the commissioner's judgment, these activities will promote the purposes of the Insurance Code.  The actual and necessary expenses incurred by this participation shall be paid out of the Insurance Department appropriation.  The commissioner may not make any commitments that are not terminable on reasonable notice by the commissioner.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

